Florida, session 2026, SB1026.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 19 20 Section 1.âSubsection (30) is added to section 409.906, 21 Florida Statutes, to read: 22 409.906âOptional Medicaid services.âSubject to specific 23 appropriations, the agency may make payments for services which 24 are optional to the state under Title XIX of the Social Security 25 Act and are furnished by Medicaid providers to recipients who 26 are determined to be eligible on the dates on which the services 27 were provided. Any optional service that is provided shall be 28 provided only when medically necessary and in accordance with 29 state and federal law. Optional services rendered by providers 30 in mobile units to Medicaid recipients may be restricted or 31 prohibited by the agency. Nothing in this section shall be 32 construed to prevent or limit the agency from adjusting fees, 33 reimbursement rates, lengths of stay, number of visits, or 34 number of services, or making any other adjustments necessary to 35 comply with the availability of moneys and any limitations or 36 directions provided for in the General Appropriations Act or 37 chapter 216. If necessary to safeguard the stateâs systems of 38 providing services to elderly and disabled persons and subject 39 to the notice and review provisions of s. 216.177, the Governor 40 may direct the Agency for Health Care Administration to amend 41 the Medicaid state plan to delete the optional Medicaid service 42 known as âIntermediate Care Facilities for the Developmentally 43 Disabled.â Optional services may include: 44 (30)âCOMMUNITY HEALTH WORKERS.âThe agency may pay for the 45 provision of community health worker services including, but not 46 limited to, health promotion, wellness coaching, and self 47 management education; cultural mediation; interpretation or 48 translation services; health system navigation; patient and 49 family advocacy; outreach before appointments, including 50 appointment reminders; outreach to ensure adherence to 51 treatments and medications; home visits; individual, community, 52 and environmental assessments; arranging transportation; making 53 connections to community resources or social services; and 54 providing care coordination and case management. 55 (a)âAs used in this subsection, the term âcommunity health 56 workerâ means a frontline public health worker who provides a 57 range of services addressing the health and social needs of the 58 community and is a trusted member of or has a close 59 understanding of the community he or she serves. The term 60 includes community health representatives, promotores de salud, 61 and workers of public or private community-based organizations. 62 (b)âThe agency shall adopt rules to implement this 63 subsection, including, but not limited to, rules establishing 64 eligible services provided by community health workers. 65 (c)âThe agency may seek federal approval necessary to 66 implement this subsection. 67 Section 2.âPresent paragraphs (c) through (u) of subsection 68 (3) of section 409.908, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as 69 paragraphs (d) through (v), respectively, and a new paragraph 70 (c) is added to that subsection, to read: 71 409.908âReimbursement of Medicaid providers.âSubject to 72 specific appropriations, the agency shall reimburse Medicaid 73 providers, in accordance with state and federal law, according 74 to methodologies set forth in the rules of the agency and in 75 policy manuals and handbooks incorporated by reference therein. 76 These methodologies may include fee schedules, reimbursement 77 methods based on cost reporting, negotiated fees, competitive 78 bidding pursuant to s. 287.057, and other mechanisms the agency 79 considers efficient and effective for purchasing services or 80 goods on behalf of recipients. If a provider is reimbursed based 81 on cost reporting and submits a cost report late and that cost 82 report would have been used to set a lower reimbursement rate 83 for a rate semester, then the providerâs rate for that semester 84 shall be retroactively calculated using the new cost report, and 85 full payment at the recalculated rate shall be effected 86 retroactively. Medicare-granted extensions for filing cost 87 reports, if applicable, shall also apply to Medicaid cost 88 reports. Payment for Medicaid compensable services made on 89 behalf of Medicaid-eligible persons is subject to the 90 availability of moneys and any limitations or directions 91 provided for in the General Appropriations Act or chapter 216. 92 Further, nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent 93 or limit the agency from adjusting fees, reimbursement rates, 94 lengths of stay, number of visits, or number of services, or 95 making any other adjustments necessary to comply with the 96 availability of moneys and any limitations or directions 97 provided for in the General Appropriations Act, provided the 98 adjustment is consistent with legislative intent. 99 (3)âSubject to any limitations or directions provided for 100 in the General Appropriations Act, the following Medicaid 101 services and goods may be reimbursed on a fee-for-service basis. 102 For each allowable service or goods furnished in accordance with 103 Medicaid rules, policy manuals, handbooks, and state and federal 104 law, the payment shall be the amount billed by the provider, the 105 providerâs usual and customary charge, or the maximum allowable 106 fee established by the agency, whichever amount is less, with 107 the exception of those services or goods for which the agency 108 makes payment using a methodology based on capitation rates, 109 average costs, or negotiated fees. 110 (c)âCommunity health worker services. 111 Section 3.âPresent paragraphs (e) through (cc) of 112 subsection (1) of section 409.973, Florida Statutes, are 113 redesignated as paragraphs (f) through (dd), respectively, and a 114 new paragraph (e) is added to that subsection, to read: 115 409.973âBenefits.â 116 (1)âMINIMUM BENEFITS.âManaged care plans shall cover, at a 117 minimum, the following services: 118 (e)âCommunity health worker services. 119 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.